Utah statutes.
17-28-9.   Certification of eligible appointees -- Probationary period.

(1)  The fire chief of each county fire department shall notify the County Fire Civil Service executive director of all positions to be filled in his department when the need arises.  The County Fire Civil Service executive director shall then, as soon as possible, certify from the certified county fire civil service register to the head of the fire department the appropriate number of persons, consistent with adopted rules.

(2)  Appointments from the certified register shall be placed on probation under conditions and for a period as prescribed by County Fire Civil Service Council rules.



Amended by Chapter 115, 1992 General Session

